District of Columbia statutes.
11-1565

Service by retired judges.

Any retired judge performing judicial duties as a senior judge on the District of Columbia Court of Appeals or the Superior Court shall be entitled, during the period for which he or she serves, to receive the same daily rate of pay as a judge on the court in which he or she performs such duties. The cumulative daily earnings of a senior judge, in any single year, when added to the annual retirement salary, may not exceed the current annual salary of a judge of the court in which he or she performs such duties. No deduction shall be withheld for health benefits, Federal employee’s life insurance, or retirement purposes from the salary paid to a judge during judicial service. The performance of such judicial service shall not create an additional retirement, change retirement, or create, or in any manner affect a survivor annuity.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 503, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 28, 1986, 100 Stat. 3228, Pub. L. 99-573, § 14(c)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-1567.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1565.
1973 Ed., § 11-1565.